Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. In General

Cross references. —

For provision that no person except a qualified elector shall be elected or appointed to any civil or military office in the state, see art. 6, § 15, Wyo. Const.

As to consolidation of offices in state, county and municipalities, see art. 14, § 6, Wyo. Const.

§ 15-2-101.
Governing body generally.

The governing body when organized is a body corporate and politic with perpetual succession, to be known by the name designated and is capable of suing and being sued and of pleading and being impleaded in all courts and places.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 119; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-119; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 15-2-102.
Officers; election, appointment and removal; conditions for appointive office or position.

The officers of a town are a mayor and four (4) councilmen, all of whom shall be elected. Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, the clerk, treasurer, marshal, attorney, municipal judge and department heads as specified by ordinance shall be appointed by the mayor with the consent of the governing body and may be removed by the mayor for incompetency or neglect of duty. All other appointments, except the appointment of members of a board or commission, and removals shall be made by the mayor without consent of the governing body, unless consent is required by separate statute. The governing body shall determine the method of appointing members of a board or commission, unless the method of appointing such members is specified by separate statute.

The governing body, by ordinance or resolution, may specify conditions for any office or position to which a person is appointed under this section including:

Level or range of salary;

A description of the duties and responsibilities of the office or position;

Term of appointment;

Requirements for:

Promotion;

Suspension; and

Hearing of appeals from decisions of the mayor to remove or discharge an appointee other than members of a board or commission, after which the governing body may affirm, modify or reverse the mayor’s decision; and

Other matters which are part of the personnel policies of the town.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 120; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-120; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 34, § 2; 1985, ch. 42, § 1; 1993, ch. 124, § 1; 1997, ch. 68, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to powers and duties of mayor, see §

15-1-108

.

For elective officers of first class city and their terms of office, see §

15-11-103

.

Town employees possess constitutionally protected propertyright. —

Former employees of a town who held positions as chief of police, city clerk, treasurer, and supervisor of public works, possessed a constitutionally protected property right in continued employment; however, that right extended only until the end of their term of office, at which time the incoming mayor and town council had the option to replace them by authority granted by subsection (a). Farnsworth v. Pinedale, 968 F.2d 1054, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 15225 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1992).

Due process right to pretermination notice and hearing. —

A municipal judge has an identifiable property right in his office and, therefore, has a federal constitutional right to due process of law that demands notice of the cause for his discharge and a hearing on the existence of the cause prior to termination of his appointment to office. Art. 1, § 6, Wyo. Const., affords equivalent protection in such a case. Town of Upton v. Whisler, 824 P.2d 545,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1992).

Town mayor and council properly eliminated police department,

thereby terminating the plaintiff's employment as a police officer with the town, where the defendant town officials showed good cause, as required by the town's personnel policies by stating that the police department was eliminated for financial reasons; allegations were insufficient to allow a reasonable jury to conclude that the elimination of the police department was pretextual or due to personal animosity between the mayor and the police chief, in light of the financial savings which were realized and the fact that the defendants were simply fulfilling publicly made campaign promises. Farnsworth v. Pinedale, 968 F.2d 1054, 1992 U.S. App. LEXIS 15225 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1992).

§ 15-2-103.
Officers; salaries.

The governing body shall fix the salaries for the mayor and councilmen in towns not operating under the commission or city manager form of government. The salaries shall be fixed before their terms begin and shall not change during the term for which they are elected. The salary for mayor shall be paid in twelve (12) or more installments and may not exceed the maximum of twenty-four thousand dollars ($24,000.00) per year. The salary for each councilman shall be not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) for actual attendance at each regular or special meeting. All appointed officers shall receive the salary or compensation as provided by law or ordinance.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 123; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-123; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1983, ch. 66, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 8, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions that all state, city, county, town and school officers (with certain exceptions) shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, and for duty of such officers to pay all fees collected into the proper treasury, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const.

§ 15-2-104.
Mayoral veto; overriding thereof; failure to act.

The mayor is entitled to sign or veto any ordinance passed by the governing body and to sign or veto any order, bylaw, resolution, award or vote to enter into any contract or the allowance of any claim. A veto may be overridden by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the qualified members of the council. If the mayor neglects or refuses to sign any ordinance and fails to return it with his objections in writing at the next regular meeting of the governing body, it becomes law without his signature. The mayor may veto any item of any appropriation ordinance and approve the remainder thereof. The items vetoed may be passed over the veto as in other cases. The mayor does not have a vote in any matter involving the override of a veto.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 34, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to mayoral veto power in first class cities, see §

15-3-201

.